Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF778.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin CLARKS GROVE; WATER AND SEWER INFRASTRUCTURE.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Appropriation. new text end new text begin $9,900,000 is appropriated from the bond proceeds fund to the Public Facilities Authority to design, construct, and equip water and sewer infrastructure in the city of Clarks Grove. This appropriation includes money for two new lift stations, a new water treatment plant, and the replacement of sewer and water system infrastructure throughout the city. This appropriation is available after the commissioner of management and budget determines that an amount sufficient to complete the project has been committed to the project, as required by Minnesota Statutes, section 16A.502. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Bond sale. new text end new text begin To provide the money appropriated in this section from the bond proceeds fund, the commissioner of management and budget shall sell and issue bonds of the state in an amount up to $9,900,000 in the manner, upon the terms, and with the effect prescribed by Minnesota Statutes, sections 16A.631 to 16A.675, and by the Minnesota Constitution, article XI, sections 4 to 7. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end